Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4316
Agricultural lime slurry, defined.

Agricultural lime slurry shall mean pulverized limestone suspended in water and which may contain up to two percent by weight of appropriate clay and surfactant to maintain the liming material in suspension.

Laws 1981, LB 396, § 16.